src/dictionaries/lt_LT.aff
SFX M Y 41
SFX M is      iai             [^dt]is   
SFX M dis     džiai           dis       
SFX M tis     čiai            tis       
SFX M is      ies             is        
SFX M is      į               is        
SFX M is      imi             is        
SFX M is      yje             is        
SFX M is      y               is        
SFX M is      ie              is        
SFX M is      ys              is        
SFX M is      ims             is        
SFX M is      imis            is        
SFX M is      yse             is        
SFX M ys      ims             ys        
SFX M ys      is              ys        
SFX M ys      imis            ys        
SFX M ys      yse             ys        
SFX M uo      ers             uo        
SFX M uo      eriai           uo        
SFX M uo      erį             uo        
SFX M uo      erimi           uo        
SFX M uo      eryje           uo        
SFX M uo      erie            uo        
SFX M uo      erys            uo        
SFX M uo      erų             uo        
SFX M uo      erims           uo        
SFX M uo      eris            uo        
SFX M uo      erimis          uo        
SFX M uo      eryse           uo        
SFX M ė       ers             ė         
SFX M ė       eriai           ė         
SFX M ė       erį             ė         
SFX M ė       erimi           ė         
SFX M ė       eryje           ė         
SFX M ė       erie            ė         
SFX M ė       erys            ė         
SFX M ė       erų             ė         
SFX M ė       erims           ė         
SFX M ė       eris            ė         
SFX M ė       erimis          ė         
SFX M ė       eryse           ė         

SFX C Y 91
SFX C as      o               as        
SFX C as      am              as        
SFX C as      ą               as        
SFX C as      uo              as        
SFX C as      ame             as        
SFX C as      ie              as        
SFX C as      ų               as        
SFX C as      iems            as        
SFX C as      uos             as        
SFX C as      ais             as        
SFX C as      uose            as        
SFX C s       io              ks        
SFX C s       iam             ks        
SFX C s       į               ks        
SFX C s       iu              ks        
SFX C s       iame            ks        
SFX C s       ie              ks        
SFX C s       ių              ks        
SFX C s       iems            ks        
SFX C s       ius             ks        
SFX C s       iais            ks        
SFX C s       iuose           ks        
SFX C is      io              [^j]is    
SFX C is      iam             [^j]is    
SFX C is      į               [^j]is    
SFX C is      iuo             [^j]is    
SFX C is      iame            [^j]is    
SFX C is      ie              [^j]is    
SFX C is      ių              [^j]is    
SFX C is      iems            [^j]is    
SFX C is      iuos            [^j]is    
SFX C is      iais            [^j]is    
SFX C is      iuose           [^j]is    
SFX C is      o               jis       
SFX C is      am              jis       
SFX C is      į               jis       
SFX C is      uo              jis       
SFX C is      ame             jis       
SFX C is      ie              jis       
SFX C is      ų               jis       
SFX C is      iems            jis       
SFX C is      uos             jis       
SFX C is      ais             jis       
SFX C is      uose            jis       
SFX C a       os              a         
SFX C a       ai              a         
SFX C a       ą               a         
SFX C a       a               a         
SFX C a       oje             a         
SFX C a       ų               a         
SFX C a       oms             a         
SFX C a       as              a         
SFX C a       omis            a         
SFX C a       ose             a         
SFX C i       os              ji        
SFX C i       ai              ji        
SFX C i       ą               ji        
SFX C i       a               ji        
SFX C i       oje             ji        
SFX C i       oj              ji        
SFX C i       ų               ji        
SFX C i       oms             ji        
SFX C i       as              ji        
SFX C i       omis            ji        
SFX C i       ose             ji        
SFX C 0       os              [^j]i     
SFX C 0       ai              [^j]i     
SFX C 0       ą               [^j]i     
SFX C 0       a               [^j]i     
SFX C 0       oje             [^j]i     
SFX C 0       oj              [^j]i     
SFX C 0       ų               [^j]i     
SFX C 0       oms             [^j]i     
SFX C 0       as              [^j]i     
SFX C 0       omis            [^j]i     
SFX C 0       ose             [^j]i     
SFX C du      dviejų          udu       
SFX C du      dviem           udu       
SFX C du      dviejuose       udu       
SFX C dvi     dviejų          udvi      
SFX C dvi     dviem           udvi      
SFX C dvi     dviejose        udvi      
SFX C uodu    ųdviejų         uodu      
SFX C uodu    iedviem         uodu      
SFX C uodu    iemdviem        uodu      
SFX C iedu    ųdviejų         iedu      
SFX C iedu    iedviem         iedu      
SFX C iedu    iemdviem        iedu      
SFX C iedvi   ųdviejų         iedvi     
SFX C iedvi   omdviem         iedvi     
SFX C iedvi   odviem          iedvi     

SFX B Y 44
SFX B is      io              [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iam             [^dt]is   
SFX B is      į               [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iu              [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iame            [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iai             [^dt]is   
SFX B is      ių              [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iams            [^dt]is   
SFX B is      ius             [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iais            [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iuose           [^dt]is   
SFX B tis     čio             tis       
SFX B tis     čiam            tis       
SFX B tis     tį              tis       
SFX B tis     čiu             tis       
SFX B tis     čiame           tis       
SFX B tis     čiai            tis       
SFX B tis     čių             tis       
SFX B tis     čiams           tis       
SFX B tis     čius            tis       
SFX B tis     čiais           tis       
SFX B tis     čiuose          tis       
SFX B dis     džio            dis       
SFX B dis     džiam           dis       
SFX B dis     dį              dis       
SFX B dis     džiu            dis       
SFX B dis     džiame          dis       
SFX B dis     džiai           dis       
SFX B dis     džių            dis       
SFX B dis     džiams          dis       
SFX B dis     džius           dis       
SFX B dis     džiais          dis       
SFX B dis     džiuose         dis       
SFX B is      ė               is        
SFX B is      ės              is        
SFX B is      ei              is        
SFX B is      ę               is        
SFX B is      e               is        
SFX B is      ėje             is        
SFX B is      ėj              is        
SFX B is      ėms             is        
SFX B is      es              is        
SFX B is      ėmis            is        
SFX B is      ėse             is        
